Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB171.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 262.900 TO 262.920 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no entity authorized to
exercise the power of eminent domain shall take by eminent domain any privately
owned property that is subject to an agricultural conservation easement, except
where the proceeding is maintained by the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet in
furtherance of its statutory mandates, or by a utility for the purposes listed in
KRS 278.020(1)(a).
(2) (a) An owner of property subject to an agricultural conservation easement who
has been served with a summons of condemnation proceedings concerning
property subject to the agricultural conservation easement may request a
public hearing on the proposed taking of land to be held before the local
soil and water conservation district board of supervisors.
(b) The condemnor shall provide at the public hearing a written report
justifying the condemnation of the specific property at issue due to the lack
of feasible alternative locations to satisfy the purposes of the project.
(c) No action in the condemnation proceeding shall affect the property owner's
right to a public hearing under this subsection.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Any person not a party to an eminent domain proceeding under KRS Chapter 416 who
owns real property adjoining condemned property and incurs damage to his or her real
property as a result of the condemnor's entry upon either the condemned property or
the person's property may file a claim for actual damages, court costs, and reasonable
attorney's fees against the condemnor.
Page 1 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 413 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
An action under Section 2 of this Act shall be filed within five (5) years of the time that
the claimant discovers or should have discovered the damages caused to the property
by the condemnor.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 416 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no land condemned by eminent
domain under this chapter or any other grant of condemnation authority under state
law shall be used for the construction of a facility that generates electricity using solar
energy.
Section 5. KRS 262.850 is amended to read as follows:
(1) This section shall be known as "the Agricultural District and Conservation Act."
(2) It is the policy of the state to conserve, protect, and to encourage development and
improvement of its agricultural lands for the production of food and other
agricultural products. It is also the policy of this state to conserve and protect the
agricultural land base as a valuable natural resource which is both fragile and finite.
The pressure imposed by urban expansion, transportation systems, water
impoundments, surface mining of mineral resources, utility rights-of-way, and
industrial development has continually reduced the land resource base necessary to
sufficiently produce food and fiber for our future needs. It is the purpose of this
section to provide a means by which agricultural land may be protected and
enhanced as a viable segment of the state's economy and as an important resource.
(3) The local governing administrative body for an agricultural district shall be the
conservation district board of supervisors. The Soil and Water Conservation
Commission shall be responsible for statewide administration of the agricultural
district program and shall have sole authority to certify or deny agricultural district
Page 2 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
petitions. The commission may apply for assistance and funds from the Federal
Farmland Protection Act of 1981, Pub. L. No. 97-377, which may be available for
the development of the agricultural district program and may accept easements as
provided in KRS 65.410 to 65.480.
(4) Any owner or owners of land may submit a petition to the local conservation
district board of supervisors requesting the creation of an agricultural district within
the county. The petition shall include a description of the proposed area, description
of each land parcel, location of the proposed boundaries, petitioners' names and
addresses, adjacent landowners' names and addresses, and other pertinent
information as required in the petition application. The boundary of an agricultural
district shall be contiguous. No land shall be included in an agricultural district
without the consent of the owner.
(5) Upon receipt of a petition, the local conservation district board of supervisors shall
notify the fiscal court and any local or regional planning or zoning body, if any, of
the proposed agricultural district, and shall notify each city that is located less than
one (1) mile from the boundaries of the proposed agricultural district, by sending a
copy of the petition and accompanying materials to that body.
(6) The following factors shall be considered by the local conservation district board of
supervisors and the Soil and Water Conservation Commission when considering the
formation of any agricultural district:
(a) The capability of the land to support agricultural production, as indicated by[:]
soil, climate, topography or other natural factors;
(b) The viability of active farmlands, as indicated by[:] markets for farm
products, the extent and nature of farm improvements, the present status of
farming, and anticipated trends in agricultural economic conditions and
technology;
(c) That the proposed agricultural district meets the minimum size limit of fifty
Page 3 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
(50) contiguous acres, unless the local conservation district board and the Soil
and Water Conservation Commission allow fewer than fifty (50) contiguous
acres if the proposed area meets a minimum annual production performance
established by the district board and approved by the commission;
(d) County development patterns and needs and the location of the district in
relation to any urban development boundaries within the county;
(e) Any matter which may be relevant to evaluate the petition; and
(f) Whether an application is from more than one (1) farm owner, in which case a
preference shall be given to the application.
(7) The local soil and water conservation district board of supervisors shall review the
petition application and submit a recommendation to the Soil and Water
Conservation Commission within one hundred (100) days of receipt. The local
conservation district recommendation shall be submitted to the commission in the
form of approval, approval with modifications, or denial of the petition
accompanied by justification for such a denial.
(8) The Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall review the recommendation of
the district board of supervisors and certify or deny the agricultural district's
petition within one hundred (100) days of receipt.
(9) Upon the approval of a petition by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission,
the commission shall notify the area development district in which the agricultural
district will lie, the local county clerk, the clerk of each city that is located less than
one (1) mile from the boundaries of the approved agricultural district, and the
secretary of the Governor's Executive Cabinet by sending a description of the
boundaries and the names and addresses of the property owners within the district.
(10) Land within the boundary of an agricultural district shall not be annexed.
(11) The owners of land within the boundary of an agricultural district shall be exempt
under KRS 74.177 from any assessment authorized for the extension of water
Page 4 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
service lines until the land is removed from the district and developed for
nonagricultural use.
(12) Any member, or any successor heir of the member, of an agricultural district may
withdraw his or her property from the district upon notifying the local conservation
district board of supervisors in writing. The removal of the property from the
agricultural district shall be effective immediately upon the district board of
supervisors' receipt of the written notification, at which time the district board of
supervisors shall remove the property from the agricultural district and shall
immediately provide written notice of the changed boundaries to the those entities
listed in subsection (9) of this section.
(13) It shall be the policy of all state agencies to support the formation of agricultural
districts as a means of preserving Kentucky's farmlands and to mitigate the impact
of their present and future plans and programs upon the continued agricultural use
of land within an agricultural district.
(14) Agricultural districts shall be comprised only of agricultural land as defined in KRS
132.010.
(15) An agricultural district shall be established for five (5) years with a review to be
made by the local soil and water conservation district board of supervisors at the
end of the five-year period and every five (5) years thereafter. Each owner of land
shall agree to remain in the district for a five (5) year period, unless a member
elects to withdraw his or her property pursuant to subsection (12) of this section,
which is renewable at the end of the five (5) years. However, the board shall make a
review any time upon the written request of a local government which demonstrates
that the review is necessary in order to consider development needs of the local
government. The board shall consider whether the continued existence of the
district is justified, any adjustments which may be necessary due to urban or county
development, and other factors the board finds relevant. The board shall revise the
Page 5 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
district as necessary based on the review and subject to approval of the State Soil
and Water Conservation Commission. Before the state commission takes final
action, all interested parties shall be given the opportunity to request the state
commission to amend or overturn the local board's decision.
(16) The withdrawal of a member from a district reducing the remaining acreage of
agricultural district land to less than fifty (50) acres or resulting in the remaining
land being noncontiguous shall not cause the decertification of the district. The
local district board of supervisors may consider a dissolution of the agricultural
district if the withdrawal results in the remaining property within the agricultural
district no longer meeting the definition of agricultural land as defined in KRS
132.010.
(17) (a) No land within the boundaries of an agricultural district shall be subject to
a taking by eminent domain, except where the proceeding is maintained by
the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet in furtherance of its statutory
mandates or by a utility for the purposes listed in KRS 278.020(1)(a).
(b) Any member of an agricultural district who has received a summons of
condemnation proceedings being instituted concerning the member's land
located in the district may request the local soil and water conservation district
board of supervisors to hold a public hearing on the proposed taking of land,
at which the condemnor shall provide a written report justifying the
condemnation of the specific land due to the lack of feasible alternative
locations to satisfy the purposes of the project.
(c) No action in the condemnation proceeding shall affect the member's right
to a public hearing under this subsection[ However a hearing under this
section shall not be held if the petitioner in the condemnation proceeding is a
utility as defined in KRS 278.010(3) and obtained a certificate of convenience
and necessity as required by KRS 278.020(1)].
Page 6 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
(18) (a) The board shall notify the local property valuation administrator of the farms
which belong to an agricultural district and whenever a farm is withdrawn
from a district. The board shall also inform all members of a district of the
right to have their land assessed by the local property valuation administrator
at the land's agricultural use value and shall offer advice and assistance on
obtaining such an assessment.
(b) The board shall also notify the local property valuation administrator
whenever a farm is released or withdrawn from an agricultural district.
(19) The board may allow an amendment to an existing certified agricultural district if
approved by the commission.
Section 6. KRS 382.850 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A conservation easement shall not be transferred by owners of property in which
there are outstanding subsurface rights without the prior written consent of the
owners of the subsurface rights.
(2) A conservation easement shall not operate to limit, preclude, delete, or require
waivers for the conduct of coal mining operations, including the transportation of
coal, upon any part or all of adjacent or surrounding properties[; and shall not
operate to impair or restrict any right or power of eminent domain created by
statute, and all such rights and powers shall be exercisable as if the conservation
easement did not exist].
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no entity authorized to
exercise the power of eminent domain shall take by eminent domain any privately
owned property that is subject to a conservation easement, except the Kentucky
Transportation Cabinet in furtherance of its statutory mandates or a utility for
the purposes listed in KRS 278.020(1)(a).
(4) (a) An owner of property subject to a conservation easement who has been
served with a summons of condemnation proceedings concerning property
Page 7 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
subject to the conservation easement may request a public hearing on the
proposed taking of land to be held before the local soil and water
conservation district board of supervisors.
(b) The condemnor shall provide a written report justifying the condemnation
of the specific property at issue due to the lack of feasible alternative
locations to satisfy the purposes of the project.
(c) No action in the condemnation proceeding shall affect the property owner's
right to a public hearing under this subsection.
Section 7. KRS 416.560 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of [the ]law, a department, instrumentality or
agency of a consolidated local government, city, county, or urban-county
government, other than a waterworks corporation the capital stock of which is
wholly owned by a city of the first class or a consolidated local government, having
a right of eminent domain under other statutes shall exercise such right only by
requesting the governing body of the consolidated local government, city, county,
or urban-county government to institute condemnation proceedings on its behalf. If
the governing body of the consolidated local government, city, county, or urban-
county government agrees, it shall institute condemnation[such] proceedings under
KRS 416.570, and all costs involved in the condemnation shall be borne by the
department, instrumentality, or agency requesting the condemnation.
(2) If any department, instrumentality, or agency of a consolidated local government,
city, county, or urban-county government, other than a waterworks corporation the
capital stock of which is wholly owned by a city of the first class or a consolidated
local government, operates in more than one (1) governmental unit, it shall request
the governing body of the consolidated local government, city, county, or urban-
county government wherein the largest part of the individual tract of the property
sought to be condemned lies, to institute condemnation proceedings on its behalf.
Page 8 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
(3) A department, instrumentality, or agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, other
than the Transportation Cabinet and local boards of education, having a right of
eminent domain under other statutes shall exercise that[such] right only by
requesting the Finance and Administration Cabinet to institute condemnation
proceedings on its behalf. If the Finance and Administration Cabinet agrees, it shall
institute such proceedings under KRS 416.570, and all costs involved in the
condemnation shall be borne by the department, instrumentality, or agency
requesting the condemnation.
(4) (a) Prior to the filing of the petition to condemn, the condemnor or its employees
or agents shall have the right to enter upon any land or improvement which it
has the power to condemn, in order to make studies, surveys, tests, sounding,
and appraisals, provided that the condemnee[owner of the land or the party in
whose name the property is assessed] has been notified in accordance with
paragraph (b) of this subsection no later than ten (10) days prior to entry on
the property.
(b) Notification under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be sent by certified
mail, return receipt requested, to the condemnee's last known address listed
on the real property tax rolls of the county and shall include the following
information:
1. That all or a portion of the property is necessary for a public project;
2. The nature of the project for which the parcel is considered necessary
and the parcel designation of the property to be acquired;
3. That, within fifteen (15) business days after receipt of a request by the
condemnee, the condemnor will provide copies, to the extent prepared,
of:
a. Right-of-way maps or other documents that depict the proposed
taking; and
Page 9 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
b. Construction plans that depict project improvements to be
constructed on the property taken and improvements to be
constructed adjacent to the remaining property, including but
not limited to plan, profile, cross-section, drainage, and
pavement marking sheets, and driveway connection detail;
4. If a condemnor has entered into a public-private partnership for the
public project for which the property is considered necessary, a
disclosure of the identities of existing and potential future private
partners involved in the project. For purposes of this subparagraph,
"public-private partnership" and "private partner" have the same
meaning as in KRS 65.025; and
5. A statement of the condemnee's statutory rights under the Eminent
Domain Act of Kentucky, KRS 416.540 to 416.670, or alternatively,
copies of those provisions of law.
(c) Any actual damages sustained by the owner of a property interest in the
property entered upon by the condemnor shall be paid by the condemnor and
shall be assessed by the court or the court may refer the matter to
commissioners to ascertain and assess the damages sustained by the
condemnee, which award shall be subject to appeal.
(5) Failure to provide notice under subsection (4)(b) of this section shall result in a
penalty of five percent (5%) of the compensation awarded to the condemnee
under Section 12 of this Act to be assessed as costs.
Section 8. KRS 416.570 is amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in KRS 416.560, a condemnor seeking to condemn
property or the use and occupation of the property[thereof], shall file a verified petition
in the Circuit Court of the county in which all or the greater portion of the property
sought to be condemned is located, which petition shall state that it is filed under [the
Page 10 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
provisions of ]KRS 416.550 to 416.670 and shall contain, in substance:
(1) Allegations sufficient to show that the petitioner is entitled, under the provisions of
applicable law, to exercise the right of eminent domain and to condemn the
property, or the use and occupation of the property[thereof], sought to be taken in
the condemnation[such] proceedings;
(2) A statement certifying that the:
(a) Proposed condemnation will not violate Section 1, 4, 5, or 6 of this Act;
(b) Condemnor has conducted due diligence; and
(c) Project for which the land proposed to be condemned cannot be reasonably
placed in an alternate location or routed in a manner that would be less
disruptive to layout or operations of current and potential uses of the
property;
(3) A particular description of the property and the use and occupation of the
property[thereof] sought to be condemned; and
(4)[(3)] An application to the court to appoint commissioners to award the amount of
compensation the owner of the property sought to be condemned is entitled to
receive under Section 12 of this Act[therefor].
Section 9. KRS 416.580 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Circuit Court, or in the absence of the Circuit Judge from the county, the
Circuit Court Clerk, shall appoint as commissioners an independent real
estate appraiser certified under KRS Chapter 324A and three (3) impartial
housekeepers of the county who are owners of land. They shall be sworn to
faithfully and impartially discharge their duties under this section. The
commissioners shall view the land or material sought to be condemned and
award to the owner or owners such a sum as will fairly represent the reduction
in the market value of the entire property, all of or a portion of which is
sought to be condemned, said sum being the difference between the fair
Page 11 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
market value of the entire property immediately before the taking and the fair
market value of the remainder of the property immediately after the taking[
thereof], together with the fair rental value of any temporary easements sought
to be condemned. Within fifteen (15) days from the date of their appointment
they shall return a written report to the office of the Circuit Court, stating the
above values in their award and shall describe in their report the property
sought to be condemned. They shall be allowed a reasonable fee which shall
be taxed as costs.
(b) If any person appointed to serve as commissioner fails, refuses, or becomes
incapable of acting, the court[, or judge thereof] shall without
delay[forthwith] appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. A majority of
the commissioners appointed and qualified have the power to act and to make
and sign the award and report. If a majority of the commissioners do not agree
on a decision, four (4)[three (3)] new commissioners shall be appointed by
the court on application by any of the parties to the action.
(2) In eminent domain proceedings instituted pursuant to KRS 99.700 to 99.730, in
determining the fair market [of ]value of blighted or deteriorated property, the
commissioners shall consider:
(a) The estimated cost of repairs necessary to bring the property up to the
minimum standards of the local housing or nuisance code as determined by an
independent appraiser, general building or residential contractor, or inspector;
or
(b) The cost of demolition of the property, if the commissioners determine that
demolition would be the most cost-effective manner of addressing the
blighted or deteriorated structures on the property.
Section 10. KRS 416.610 is amended to read as follows:
(1) After the owner has been summoned twenty (20) days, the court shall examine the
Page 12 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
report of the commissioners to determine whether it conforms to the provisions of
KRS 416.580. If the report of the commissioners is not in the proper form the court
shall require the commissioners to make such corrections as are necessary.
(2) If no answer or other pleading is filed by the owner or owners putting in issue the
right of the petitioner to condemn the property or the use and occupation of the
property[thereof] sought to be condemned, the court shall enter an interlocutory
judgment which shall contain, in substance:
(a) A finding that the petitioner has the right[,] under [the provisions of ]KRS
416.550 to 416.670 and other applicable law to condemn the property or the
use and occupation of the property[thereof];
(b) A finding that the report of the commissioners conforms to the provisions of
KRS 416.580;
(c) An authorization to take possession of the property for the purposes and under
the conditions and limitations, if any, set forth in the petition upon payment to
the owner or to the clerk of the court the amount of the compensation awarded
by the commissioners;
(d) Proper provision for the conveyance of the title to the land and material, to the
extent condemned, as adjudged therein in the event no exception is taken as
provided in KRS 416.620(1).
(3) Any exception from the[such] interlocutory judgment by either party or both parties
shall be confined solely to exceptions to the amount of compensation awarded by
the commissioners.
(4) If the owner has filed an answer or pleading putting in issue the right of the
petitioner to condemn the property or use and occupation thereof sought to be
condemned, the court shall, without intervention of a jury, proceed without
delay[forthwith] to hear and determine whether or not the petitioner has that[such]
right. If the court determines that petitioner has condemnation[such] rights, an
Page 13 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
interlocutory judgment, as provided for in subsection (2) of this section, shall be
entered. If the court determines that petitioner does not have that[such] right, it
shall enter a final judgment which shall contain, in substance:
(a) A finding that the report of the commissioners conforms to [the provisions of
]KRS 416.580;
(b) A finding that the petitioner is not authorized to condemn the property or the
use and occupation of the property[thereof] for the purposes and under the
conditions and limitations set forth in the petition, stating the particular
ground or grounds on which the petitioner is not so authorized;
(c) An order dismissing the petition and directing the petitioner to pay all costs,
expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees.
Section 11. KRS 416.620 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Within thirty (30) days from the date of entry of an interlocutory judgment
authorizing the petitioner to take possession of the property, exceptions may be
filed by either party or both parties by filing with the clerk of the Circuit Court and
serving upon the other party or parties a statement of exceptions, which statement
shall contain any exceptions the party has to the award made by the commissioners.
The statement of exceptions shall be tried, but shall be limited to the questions
which are raised in the original statements of the exceptions, or as amended, but the
owner shall not be permitted to raise any question, nor shall the court reconsider
any question so raised, concerning the right of the petitioner to condemn the
property. All questions of fact pertaining to the amount of compensation to the
owner, or owners, shall be determined by a jury, which jury on the motion of either
party shall be sent by the court, in the charge of the sheriff, to view the land and
material. After a jury trial, and if possession previously has not been taken by the
condemnor of the land and material condemned, the condemnor[it] may do so upon
the payment to the owner or to the clerk of the Circuit Court the amount of the
Page 14 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
compensation adjudged by the Circuit Court to be due the owner.
(2) Appeals may be taken to the Court of Appeals from the final judgment of the
Circuit Court as in other cases except that an appeal by the owner shall not operate
as a supersedeas.
(3) The payment by the condemnor of the amount of compensation awarded and the
taking of possession of the lands and material condemned shall not prejudice its
right to except from the award of the commissioners or the judgment of any court,
nor shall the acceptance by the owner of the amount of the compensation awarded
prejudice his or her right to except from the award of the commissioners or the
judgment of any court.
(4) All costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees in the Circuit Court shall be
adjudged against the condemnor.
(5) If the condemnor takes possession of the property condemned and the amount of
compensation is thereafter increased over that awarded by the commissioners, the
condemnor shall pay interest to the owner at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum
upon the amount of such increase from the date the condemnor took possession of
the property. If the condemnor takes possession of the property condemned and the
amount of compensation is thereafter decreased below that awarded by the
commissioners, the condemnor shall be entitled to a personal judgment against the
owner for the amount of the decrease plus interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per
annum from the date the owner accepted the amount of compensation the
condemnor paid into court or to the owner. If the owner at all times refuses to
accept the payment tendered by the condemnor, no interest shall be allowed in the
judgment against the owner for the amount of the decrease.
(6) Upon the final determination of exceptions, or upon expiration of thirty (30) days
from entry of the interlocutory judgment if no exceptions are filed, the Circuit Court
shall make such orders as may be proper for the conveyance of the title to the extent
Page 15 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
condemned, to the property, and shall enter such final judgment as may be
appropriate.
Section 12. KRS 416.660 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In all actions for the condemnation of lands under the provisions of KRS 416.550 to
416.670, except temporary easements, there shall be awarded to the landowners as
compensation [such ]a sum that[as] will fairly represent the difference between the
fair market value of the entire tract, all or a portion of which is sought to be
condemned, immediately before the taking and the fair market value of the
remainder [thereof ]immediately after the taking, including in the remainder all
rights which the landowner may retain in the lands sought to be condemned where
less than the fee simple interest [therein ]is taken, together with the fair rental value
of any temporary easements sought to be condemned.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the fair market value of
property in an eminent domain proceeding shall be the price on the valuation
date for the highest and best use of the property which a vendor, willing but not
obligated to sell, would accept for the property, and which a purchaser, willing
but not obligated to buy, would pay, excluding any increment in value
proximately caused by the public project for which the property condemned is
needed.
(3) The fair market value of property actively used for conservation, farm, or
agricultural purposes in an eminent domain proceeding shall be one hundred
twenty-five percent (125%) of the highest appraised value of the property.
(4) Any change in the fair market value prior to the date of condemnation which the
condemnor or condemnee establishes was substantially due to the general knowledge of
the imminence of condemnation or the construction of the project shall be disregarded in
determining fair market value. The taking date for valuation purposes shall be either the
date the condemnor takes the land, or the date of the trial of the issue of just
Page 16 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
compensation, whichever occurs first.
Section 13. KRS 416.675 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every grant of authority contained in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to exercise the
power of eminent domain shall be subject to the condition that the authority be
exercised only to effectuate a public use of the condemned property.
(2) "Public use" shall mean the following:
(a) Ownership of the property by the Commonwealth, a political subdivision of
the Commonwealth, or other governmental entity;
(b) The possession, occupation, or enjoyment of the property as a matter of right
by the Commonwealth, a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or other
governmental entity;
(c) The acquisition and transfer of property for the purpose of eliminating
blighted areas, slum areas, or substandard and insanitary areas in accordance
with KRS Chapter 99;
(d) The use of the property for the creation or operation of public utilities or
common carriers; or
(e) Other use of the property expressly authorized by statute.
(3) (a) No provision in the law of the Commonwealth shall be construed to authorize
the condemnation of private property for transfer to a private owner for the
purpose of economic development that benefits the general public only
indirectly, such as by increasing the tax base, tax revenues, or employment, or
by promoting the general economic health of the community.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "private owner" includes public-private
partnerships as defined in KRS 65.025, individuals, corporations or other
business entities, and nongovernmental entities.
(c) [However, ]This subsection[provision] shall not prohibit the sale or lease of
property to private entities that occupy an incidental area within a public
Page 17 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1154
project or building, provided that no property may be condemned primarily
for the purpose of facilitating an incidental private use.
(4) The exercise of the power of eminent domain for the acquisition of property
financed by state road funds or federal highway funds shall be exempt from the
provisions of this section.
Page 18 of 18
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:19 AM Jacketed